Washington statutes.
RCW 15.36.421

Milk processing plant or producer—License suspension.

(1) If the director finds a milk processing plant or producer operating under conditions that constitute an immediate danger to public health, safety, or welfare or if the licensee or an employee of the licensee actively prevents the director or the director's representative, during an on-site inspection, from determining whether such a condition exists, the director may summarily suspend a license provided for in this chapter.

(2) If a license is summarily suspended, the holder of the license shall be notified in writing that the license is, upon service of the notice, immediately suspended and that prompt opportunity for a hearing will be provided.

(3) If a license is summarily suspended, processing and shipping operations shall immediately cease. However, the director may reinstate the license if the condition that caused the suspension has been abated to the director's satisfaction.

[ 1999 c 291 s 16; 1994 c 143 s 503.]